ro-RO: Utilizarea suprafeței de antrenament: Patinaj pe gheață; Multisport; Folie pentru patinoar; Hochei pe role; Mânuirea crosei; Altele
zh-CN: 训练场地使用情况: 滑冰; 综合运动; 冰场垫层; 轮滑冰球; 运杆; 其他
pt-BR: Superfície de treinamento uso: Patinação no gelo; Multiesporte; Lona para pista de gelo; Hóquei sobre patins; Manuseio do taco; Outro
hu: Edzőfelület használata: Korcsolyázás; Multisport; Pályabélés; Görhoki; Ütőkezelés; Egyéb
tr: Eğitim yüzeyi kullanımı: Buz pateni; Çoklu spor; Pist astarı; Roller hokey; Sopa hakimiyeti; Diğer
ja: トレーニング面用途: アイススケート; マルチスポーツ; リンクライナー; ローラーホッケー; スティックハンドリング; その他
it: Utilizzo della superficie di allenamento: Pattinaggio su ghiaccio; Multisport; Telo per pista; Hockey in-line; Gestione della stecca; Altro
pl: Wykorzystanie nawierzchni do treningu: Łyżwiarstwo; Wielosportowe; Folia do lodowiska; Hokej na rolkach; Operowanie kijem; Inne
es: Uso de la superficie de entrenamiento: Patinaje sobre hielo; Multideporte; Revestimiento de pista; Hockey sobre ruedas; Manejo del bastón; Otro
vi: Sử dụng bề mặt huấn luyện: Trượt băng; Đa môn thể thao; Lót sân băng; Khúc côn cầu trên patin; Xử lý gậy; Khác
sl-SI: Uporaba vadbene površine: Drsanje; Več športov; Podloga za drsališče; Hokej na rolerjih; Upravljanje palice; Drugo
bg-BG: Предназначение на тренировъчната настилка: Каране на кънки на лед; Мултиспорт; Подложка за пързалка; Ролер хокей; Работа със стик; Друго
cs: Využití tréninkového povrchu: Bruslení na ledě; Multisportovní; Fólie na kluziště; Inline hokej; Práce s holí; Jiné
lt-LT: Treniruočių paviršiaus naudojimas: Čiuožimas ledu; Įvairus sportas; Čiuožyklos danga; Riedučių ritulys; Lazdos valdymas; Kita
sv: Användning av träningsyta: Skridskoåkning; Multisport; Rinkduk; Rullskridskohockey; Klubbteknik; Övrigt
hr-HR: Korištenje površine za trening: Klizanje na ledu; Više sportova; Podloga za klizalište; Hokej na koturaljkama; Rad palicom; Ostalo
ko: 훈련 표면 사용: 아이스스케이팅; 멀티 스포츠; 링크 라이너; 롤러 하키; 스틱 핸들링; 기타
pt-PT: Utilização da superfície de treino: Patinagem no gelo; Multidesportivo; Revestimento de pista; Hóquei em patins; Manuseamento do taco; Outro
nb: Bruk av treningsflate: Skøytegåing; Multisport; Baneduk; Rullehockey; Kølleteknikk; Annet
ru: Назначение тренировочной поверхности: Катание на коньках; Мультиспорт; Подкладка для катка; Роллеркей; Владение клюшкой; Другое
de: Verwendungszweck des Trainingsuntergrunds: Schlittschuhlaufen; Multisport; Eisbahnfolie; Rollhockey; Stickhandling; Sonstige
da: Brug af træningsunderlag: Skøjteløb; Multisport; Baneunderlag; Rulleskøjtehockey; Stavkontrol; Andet
zh-TW: 訓練場地用途: 溜冰; 綜合運動; 溜冰場襯裡; 直排輪曲棍球; 控球桿; 其他
el: Χρήση επιφάνειας προπόνησης: Πατινάζ στον πάγο; Πολλαπλά αθλήματα; Επένδυση παγοδρομίου; Ρόλερ χόκεϊ; Χειρισμός στικ; Άλλο
fi: Harjoitusalustan käyttö: Luistelu; Monilaji; Kaukalon suojapeite; Rullakiekko; Mailankäsittely; Muu
en: Training surface usage: Ice skating; Multi-sport; Rink liner; Roller hockey; Stickhandling; Other
sk-SK: Využitie tréningového povrchu: Korčuľovanie na ľade; Multisport; Fólia na klzisko; Inline hokej; Práca s hokejkou; Iné
th: การใช้งานพื้นผิวฝึกซ้อม: สเกตน้ำแข็ง; กีฬาหลายประเภท; แผ่นรองลานสเกต; โรลเลอร์ฮอกกี้; การควบคุมไม้; อื่นๆ
nl: Trainingsoppervlak gebruik: Schaatsen; Multisport; IJsbaanfolie; Rollerhockey; Stick-handling; Overig
fr: Usage de la surface d’entraînement: Patinage sur glace; Multisport; Toile de patinoire; Roller hockey; Maniement du bâton; Autre